Alabama, session 2026rs, HB393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Sections 11-66A-2, 40-9B-3, 40-9G-1,
15 40-18-372, and 41-23-252, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to
16 read as follows:
17 "§11-66A-2
18 (a) The Legislature finds and determines the public
19 good, welfare, and economy of the state are best served by
20 providing and encouraging the development, growth,
21 improvement, and support of new and creative economic
22 opportunities for existing and future qualified enterprises to
23 establish and continue projects in this state for innovative
24 processes and products. These include specifically thosethe
25 business sectors expressly identified in Accelerate Alabama
26 2.0, the strategic the current comprehensive economic
27 development plan, CatALyst, or any amended version or
28 successor document thereto, developed by the Department of
Page 1

successor document thereto, developed by the Department of
HB393 Enrolled
29 Commerce.
30 (b) In furtherance of subsection (a) the legislative
31 intent and public purpose of this chapter is:
32 (1) To provide authority to municipalities for the
33 creation of research and development corridors with corporate
34 authority and power to provide, in the discretion of the
35 corridors, its resources; and
36 (2) To provide authority to public entities to provide
37 public resources to, or for the benefit of, corridors."
38 "§40-9B-3
39 (a) For purposes of this chapter, the following words
40 and phrases mean:
41 (1) ABATE, ABATEMENT. A reduction or elimination of a
42 taxpayer's liability for tax or payments required to be made
43 in lieu thereof. An abatement of transaction taxes imposed
44 under Chapter 23 of this title, or payments required to be
45 made in lieu thereof, shall relieve the seller from the
46 obligation to collect and pay over the transaction tax as if
47 the sale were to a person exempt, to the extent of the
48 abatement, from the transaction tax.
49 (2) ALTERNATIVE ENERGY RESOURCES. The definition given
50 in Section 40-18-1.
51 (3) CONSTRUCTION RELATED TRANSACTION TAXES. The
52 transaction taxes imposed by Chapter 23 of this title, or
53 payments required to be made in lieu thereof, on tangible
54 personal property and taxable services incorporated into an
55 industrial development property, the cost of which may be
56 added to capital account with respect to the property,
Page 2

added to capital account with respect to the property,
HB393 Enrolled
57 determined without regard to any rule which permits
58 expenditures properly chargeable to capital account to be
59 treated as current expenses.
60 (4) DATA PROCESSING CENTER. An establishment at which
61 not less than 20 new jobs are located, the average annual
62 total compensation, including benefits, of such new jobs to be
63 not less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and such
64 establishment is engaged in the provision of complete
65 processing and specialized reports from data, the provision of
66 automated data processing and data entry services, the
67 provision of an infrastructure for hosting or data processing
68 services, the provision of specialized hosting activities, the
69 provision of application service provisioning, the provision
70 of general time-share mainframe facilities, the provision or
71 operation of computer equipment or enabling software for the
72 processing, storage, backup, retrieval, communication, or
73 distribution of data, or some combination of the foregoing,
74 without regard to whether any other activities are conducted
75 at the establishment.
76 (5) EDUCATION TAXES. Ad valorem taxes, or payments
77 required to be made in lieu thereof, that must, pursuant to
78 the Constitution of Alabama of 19012022, as amended,
79 legislative act, or the resolution or other action of the
80 governing board authorizing the tax, be used for educational
81 purposes or for capital improvements for education and local
82 construction related transaction taxes levied for educational
83 purposes or for capital improvements for education.
84 (6) HEADQUARTERS FACILITY. Any trade or business
Page 3

(6) HEADQUARTERS FACILITY. Any trade or business
HB393 Enrolled
85 described in NACISNAICS Code 551114, at which not less than 50
86 new jobs are located.
87 (7) HYDROPOWER PRODUCTION. The definition given in
88 Section 40-18-1.
89 (8) INDUCEMENT. Refers to an agreement, or an
90 "inducement agreement," entered into between a private user
91 and a public authority or county or municipal government
92 and/or a resolution or other official action, an "inducement
93 resolution," "inducement letter," or "official action" adopted
94 by a public authority or county or municipal government, in
95 each case expressing, among other things, the present intent
96 of such public authority or county or municipal government to
97 issue bonds in connection with the private use property
98 therein described. Notwithstanding any provision in this
99 chapter to the contrary, neither an inducement nor a request
100 for inducement shall be required to apply for, grant, or
101 receive any abatement of taxes allowed to be abated under this
102 chapter.
103 (9) INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT PROPERTY. Real and/or
104 personal property acquired in connection with establishing or
105 expanding an industrial or research enterprise in Alabama.
106 (10) INDUSTRIAL OR RESEARCH ENTERPRISE.
107 a. Any trade or business predominatelypredominantly
108 consisting of any one or more of the following:
109 1. Described by NAICS Code 1133, 115111, 2121, 22111,
110 221330, 31 (other than 311811), 32, 33, 423, 424, 482, 4862,
111 48691, 48699, 48819, 4882, 4883 (other than 48833), 493, 511,
112 5121 (other than 51213), 512215122, 513, 517, 518 (without
Page 4

5121 (other than 51213), 512215122, 513, 517, 518 (without
HB393 Enrolled
113 regard to the premise that data processing and related
114 services be performed in conjunction with a third party),
115 5191351929, 52232, 54133 (if predominantly in furtherance of
116 another activity described in this article), 54134 (if
117 predominantly in furtherance of another activity described in
118 this article), 54138, 5415, 541614, 5417, 55 (if not for the
119 production of electricity), 561422 (other than establishments
120 that originate telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512,
121 927, or 92811.
122 2. A target of the state's economic development efforts
123 pursuant to either of the following:
124 (i) The Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
125 Development Plan adopted in January 2012 by the Alabama
126 Economic Development Alliance, created by Executive Order
127 Number 21 of the Governor on July 18, 2011comprehensive
128 economic development plan, CatALyst, or any amended version or
129 successor document thereto; or
130 (ii) A type listed in a regulation adopted by the
131 Department of Commerce, other than a regulation submitted as
132 an emergency rule.
133 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the activities described
134 in this definition shall not predominantly concern farming
135 activities involving trees, animals, or crops, nor the retail
136 sale of tangible personal property or services. This provision
137 shall not be deemed to exclude customer service centers or
138 call centers otherwise allowed or provided for herein.
139 b. With respect to abatements granted in accordance
140 with Section 40-9B-9, and only with respect to such
Page 5

with Section 40-9B-9, and only with respect to such
HB393 Enrolled
141 abatements, "industrial or research enterprise" means any
142 trade or business described in NAICS Code 493, 488310, or
143 488320, when such trade or business is conducted on premises
144 in which the Alabama State Port Authority has an ownership,
145 leasehold, or other possessory interest and such premises are
146 used as part of the operations of the Alabama State Port
147 Authority.
148 c. "Industrial or research enterprise" includes the
149 above-described trades and business and any others as may
150 hereafter be reclassified in any subsequent publication of the
151 NAICS or similar industry classification system developed in
152 conjunction with the United States Department of Commerce or
153 Office of Management and Budget.
154 d. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
155 any underground natural gas storage facility which is located
156 in the Gulf Opportunity Zone, as that phrase is defined in the
157 Gulf Opportunity Zone Act of 2005, developed from existing
158 geologic reservoirs, including, without limitation, salt
159 domes, and placed in service on or before December 31, 2013.
160 e. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
161 any plant, property, or facility that meets both of the
162 following:
163 1. It produces electricity from:
164 (i) Alternative energy resources and has capital costs
165 of at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000); or
166 (ii) Hydropower production and has capital costs of at
167 least five million dollars ($5,000,000).
168 2. All or a portion of the plant, property, or facility
Page 6

2. All or a portion of the plant, property, or facility
HB393 Enrolled
169 is owned by one or more of the following:
170 (i) A utility described in Section 37-4-1(7)a.,
171 (ii) An entity organized under the provisions of
172 Chapter 6 of Title 37,.
173 (iii) An authority both organized and existing pursuant
174 to the provisions of Chapter 50A of Title 11 and subject to
175 the payments required to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales,
176 use, license, and severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7,
177 or.
178 (iv) An entity in which one or more of the foregoing
179 owns an interest.
180 f. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
181 any headquarters facility.
182 g. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
183 any data processing center.
184 h. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
185 any research and development facility.
186 i. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
187 any renewable energy facility.
188 j. "Industrial or research enterprise" also includes
189 any tourism destination attraction.
190 (11) MAJOR ADDITION. Any addition to an existing
191 industrial development property that equals the lesser of: 30
192 percent of the original cost of the industrial development
193 property or two million dollars ($2,000,000). For purposes of
194 this subsection, the original cost of existing industrial
195 development property shall be the amount of industrial
196 development property with respect to which an abatement was
Page 7

development property with respect to which an abatement was
HB393 Enrolled
197 granted under this chapter when the property was constructed,
198 or if the existing industrial development property was
199 constructed before January 1, 1993, the maximum amount that
200 would have been allowed if the provisions of this chapter had
201 applied at the time it was constructed. Only property that
202 constitutes industrial development property shall be taken
203 into account in making the determination in the previous
204 sentence. Major addition shall include any addition costing at
205 least two million dollars ($2,000,000) which constitutes an
206 industrial or research enterprise, regardless of whether added
207 to an existing industrial development property.
208 (12) MAXIMUM EXEMPTION PERIOD. Except as provided in
209 Section 40-9B-11, a period equal to the shorter of:
210 a. Either of the following:
211 1. Twenty years from and after: (i) Thethe date of
212 initial issuance by a county, city, or public authority of
213 bonds to finance any costs of a private use property,; or (ii)
214 Ifif no such bonds are ever issued, the later of: A. Thethe
215 date on which title to the property was acquired by or vested
216 in the county, city, or public authority,; or B. Thethe date
217 on which the property is or becomes owned, for federal income
218 tax purposes, by a private user; or.
219 2. Exclusively with respect to one or more private
220 users of a data processing center, the following:
221 (i) A period of 10 years from and after the date on
222 which private use property is or becomes owned, for federal
223 income tax purposes, by such private user or users (including
224 the lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location
Page 8

the lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location
HB393 Enrolled
225 centers), if the aggregate capital investment in the data
226 processing center by such private user or users does not
227 exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) within 10
228 years from the date on which a private user commences the
229 acquisition, construction, and equipping of the data
230 processing center,
231 (ii) A period of 20 years from and after the date on
232 which private use property is or becomes owned, for federal
233 income tax purposes, by such private user or users (including
234 the lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location
235 centers), if the aggregate capital investment in the data
236 processing center by such private user or users exceeds two
237 hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) but is not greater than
238 four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) within 10 years
239 from the date on which a private user commences the
240 acquisition, construction, and equipping of the data
241 processing center, or.
242 (iii) A period of 30 years from and after the date on
243 which private use property is or becomes owned, for federal
244 income tax purposes, by such private user or users (including
245 the lessor and any lessee with respect to co-location
246 centers), if the aggregate capital investment in the data
247 processing center by such private user or users exceeds two
248 hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) within 10 years from
249 the date on which a private user commences the physical work
250 of constructing and equipping the data processing center and
251 exceeds four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) within 20
252 years from the date on which a private user commences the
Page 9

years from the date on which a private user commences the
HB393 Enrolled
253 acquisition, construction, and equipping of the data
254 processing center.
255 For purposes of this subparagraph 2., a private user's
256 aggregate capital investment in a data processing center shall
257 include all real and personal property comprising a data
258 processing center, the costs of which may be capitalized for
259 federal income tax purposes. In no event shall abatements of
260 construction related transaction taxes or noneducational ad
261 valorem taxes granted for a data processing center apply
262 beyond the expiration of the applicable maximum exemption
263 period; or
264 b. The period ending on the date on which the property
265 has ceased, for 6six consecutive months, to be used in the
266 active conduct of an industrial or research enterprise.
267 (13) MORTGAGE AND RECORDING TAXES. The taxes imposed by
268 Chapter 22 of this title.
269 (14) NAICS CODE. Any sector, subsector, industry group,
270 industry or national industry of the 20122022 North American
271 Industry Classification System, or any similar classification
272 system developed in conjunction with the United States
273 Department of Commerce or Office of Management and Budget.
274 (15) NONEDUCATIONAL AD VALOREM TAXES. Ad valorem taxes,
275 or payments required to be made in lieu thereof, imposed by
276 the state, counties, municipalities, and other taxing
277 jurisdictions of Alabama that are not required to be used for
278 educational purposes or for capital improvements for
279 education.
280 (16) PERSON. Includes any individual, partnership,
Page 10

(16) PERSON. Includes any individual, partnership,
HB393 Enrolled
281 trust, estate, or corporation.
282 (17) PRIVATE USER. Any individual, partnership, or
283 corporation organized for profit that is or will be treated as
284 the owner of private use property for federal income tax
285 purposes, any entity organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37,
286 and any authority both organized and existing pursuant to
287 Chapter 50A of Title 11 and subject to the payments required
288 to be made in lieu of ad valorem, sales, use, license, and
289 severance taxes imposed by Section 11-50A-7.
290 (18) PRIVATE USE INDUSTRIAL PROPERTY. Private use
291 property that also constitutes industrial development
292 property.
293 (19) PRIVATE USE PROPERTY. Any real and/or personal
294 property which is or will be treated as owned by a private
295 user for federal income tax purposes even though title may be
296 held by a public authority or municipal or county government;
297 any real and/or personal property which is owned by any entity
298 organized under Chapter 6 of Title 37; and any real and/or
299 personal property which is owned by any authority both
300 organized and existing pursuant to Chapter 50A of Title 11,
301 and subject to the payments required to be made in lieu of ad
302 valorem, sales, use, license, and severance taxes imposed by
303 Section 11-50A-7.
304 (20) PUBLIC AUTHORITY. A corporation created for public
305 purposes pursuant to a provision of the Constitution of
306 Alabama of 19012022, or a general or local law that authorized
307 it to issue bonds, the interest on which is exempt from the
308 Alabama income tax, as in effect on May 21, 1992.
Page 11

Alabama income tax, as in effect on May 21, 1992.
HB393 Enrolled
309 (21) PUBLIC INDUSTRIAL AUTHORITY. A public authority
310 authorized to issue bonds to acquire, construct, equip, or
311 finance industrial development property.
312 (22) RENEWABLE ENERGY FACILITY. Any plant, property, or
313 facility that either:
314 a. Produces electricity or natural gas, in whole or in
315 part, from biofuels as such term is defined in Section
316 2-2-90(c)(2) or from renewable energy resources as such term
317 is defined in Section 40-18-1(30) with the exception that
318 hydropower production shall be excluded from such definition;
319 or
320 b. Produces biofuel as such term is defined in Section
321 2-2-90(c)(2).
322 (23) RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT FACILITY. An
323 establishment engaged in conducting original investigations
324 undertaken on a systematic basis to gain new knowledge or
325 applying research findings or other scientific knowledge to
326 create new or significantly improved products or processes, or
327 both.
328 (24) STATEMENT OF INTENT. A written statement of intent
329 to claim an abatement provided in this chapter, or to petition
330 for local tax abatement, relating to an industrial or research
331 enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision (10)e. of
332 this subsection that is filed with the Department of Revenue
333 at any time prior to the date on which the industrial or
334 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
335 (10)e. of this subsection is placed in service in accordance
336 with such procedures and on such form or forms as may be
Page 12

with such procedures and on such form or forms as may be
HB393 Enrolled
337 prescribed by the Department of Revenue. Such statement of
338 intent shall contain a description of the industrial or
339 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
340 (10)e. of this subsection; the date on which the acquisition,
341 construction, installation, or equipping of the industrial or
342 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
343 (10)e. of this subsection was commenced or is expected to
344 commence; the actual or, if not known, the estimated capital
345 costs of the industrial or research enterprise described in
346 paragraph e. of subdivision (10)e. of this subsection; the
347 number of new employees to be employed at the industrial or
348 research enterprise described in paragraph e. of subdivision
349 (10)e. of this subsection; and any other information required
350 by the Department of Revenue.
351 (25) TOURISM DESTINATION ATTRACTION. a. A commercial
352 enterprise which is open to the public not less than 120 days
353 during a calendar year and is designed to attract visitors
354 from inside or outside of the State of Alabama, typically for
355 its inherent cultural value, historical significance, natural
356 or man-made beauty, or entertainment or amusement
357 opportunities. The term shall include, but not be limited to,
358 a cultural or historical site; a botanical garden; a museum; a
359 wildlife park or aquarium open to the public that cares for
360 and displays a collection of animals or fish; an amusement
361 park; a convention hotel and conference center; a water park;
362 or a spectator venue or arena.
363 b. A tourism destination attraction shall not include a
364 facility primarily devoted to the retail sale of goods; a
Page 13

facility primarily devoted to the retail sale of goods; a
HB393 Enrolled
365 shopping center; a restaurant; a movie theater; a bowling
366 alley; a fitness center; a miniature golf course; or a
367 nightclub. Provided, however, that theThe capital costs of the
368 construction of a tourism destination attraction may include
369 the capital costs associated with the construction of any
370 retail establishment, restaurant or other portion of the
371 tourism destination attraction. The term also does not include
372 any gaming facility or establishment that the Secretary of the
373 Department of Commerce deems to be serving the local
374 community.
375 (b) The abatements of ad valorem taxes, and payments in
376 lieu thereof, allowed by amendments to this section by Act
377 2008-275 shall become effective for projects for which
378 statements of intent are filed after December 31, 2011. No ad
379 valorem taxes, or payments in lieu thereof, shall be abated
380 for periods prior to January 1, 2012. The other abatements
381 allowed by amendments made to this section by Act 2008-275
382 shall become effective after December 31, 2011.
383 For a qualifying industrial or research enterprise
384 described in Section 40-9B-3(a)(10)j., the approval of the
385 abatement of a specified ad valorem tax or construction
386 related tax levied or imposed by a county or municipality, or
387 payments required to be made in lieu thereof, shall take
388 effect only upon adoption of a resolution by the governing
389 body of that county or municipality approving such abatement
390 or abatements."
391 "§40-9G-1
392 For purposes of the chapter, the following words and
Page 14

For purposes of the chapter, the following words and
HB393 Enrolled
393 phrases shall have the following meaningmeanings:
394 (1) APPROVED ACTIVITY. The conduct of an activity that
395 is predominantly any one or more of the following:
396 a. Described by NAICS Code 1133, 115111, 2121, 22111,
397 221330, 31 (other than 311811), 32, 33, 423, 424, 482, 4862,
398 48691, 48699, 48819, 4882, 4883 (other than 48833), 493, 511,
399 5121 (other than 51213), 512215122, 513, 517, 518 (without
400 regard to the premise that data processing and related
401 services be performed in conjunction with a third party),
402 5191351929, 52232, 54133 (if predominantly in furtherance of
403 another activity described in this chapter), 54134 (if
404 predominantly in furtherance of another activity described in
405 this chapter), 54138, 5415, 541614, 5417, 55 (if not for the
406 production of electricity), 561422 (other than establishments
407 that originate telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512,
408 927, or 92811.
409 b. The production of biofuel as such term is defined in
410 Section 2-2-90(c)(2).
411 c. The conduct of original investigations undertaken on
412 a systematic basis to gain new knowledge or the application of
413 research findings or other scientific knowledge to create new
414 or significantly improved products or processes.
415 d. The national or regional headquarters for a company
416 that conducts significant business operations outside the
417 state and that will serve as the principal office of the
418 company's principal operating officer with chief
419 responsibility for the daily business operations of the
420 company.
Page 15

company.
HB393 Enrolled
421 e. A target of the state's economic development efforts
422 pursuant to either of the following:
423 (i) The Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
424 Development Plan adopted in January 2012 by the Alabama
425 Economic Development Alliance, created by Executive Order
426 Number 21 of the Governor on July 18, 2011comprehensive
427 economic development plan, CatALyst, or any amended version or
428 successor document thereto; or
429 (ii) A type listed in a regulation adopted by the
430 Department of Commerce, other than a regulation submitted as
431 an emergency rule.
432 Notwithstanding the foregoing, an approved activity
433 shall not predominantly concern farming activities involving
434 trees, animals, or crops, nor the retail sale of tangible
435 personal property or services. This provision shall not be
436 deemed to exclude customer service centers, call centers, or
437 headquarters otherwise allowed by this subdivision.
438 (2) COMPANY. Anyone or anything which has the powers to
439 own a project and have employees.
440 (3) NAICS CODE. Any sector, subsector, industry group,
441 industry or national industry of the 20122022 North American
442 Industry Classification System, or any similar classification
443 system developed in conjunction with the United States
444 Department of Commerce or Office of Management and Budget.
445 (4) QUALIFYING PROJECT. Any project: a. that proposes
446 to invest in capital expenditures that equal or exceed two
447 million dollars ($2,000,000) as part of any addition,
448 expansion, improvement, renovation, re-opening, or
Page 16

expansion, improvement, renovation, re-opening, or
HB393 Enrolled
449 rehabilitation of a facility, or replacement of any existing
450 equipment or tangible personal property; b. that predominantly
451 involves an approved activity; and c. for which no project
452 agreement has been entered into with the Governor for the
453 provision of other incentives.
454 (5) UTILITY TAXES. The taxes imposed by Sections
455 40-21-82 and 40-21-102."
456 "§40-18-372
457 A qualifying project must be found by the Secretary of
458 Commerce to conduct an activity specified in subdivision (1)
459 and to meet the minimum standard set forth in subdivision (2).
460 (1) A qualifying project must predominantly conduct an
461 activity that is any one or more of the following:
462 a. Described by NAICS Code 1133, 115111, 2121, 22111,
463 221330, 31 (other than 311811), 32, 33, 423, 424, 482, 4862,
464 48691, 48699, 48819, 4882, 4883 (other than 48833), 493, 511,
465 5121 (other than 51213), 512215122, 513, 517, 518 (without
466 regard to the premise that data processing and related
467 services be performed in conjunction with a third party),
468 5191351929, 52232, 54133 (if predominantly in furtherance of
469 another activity described in this article), 54134 (if
470 predominantly in furtherance of another activity described in
471 this article), 54138, 5415, 541614, 5417, 55 (if not for the
472 production of electricity), 561422 (other than establishments
473 that originate telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512,
474 927, or 92811.
475 b. The production of biofuel as such term is defined in
476 Section 2-2-90(c)(2).
Page 17

Section 2-2-90(c)(2).
HB393 Enrolled
477 c. A renewable energy generation facility that is owned
478 by one or more electric providers, as the term is defined in
479 Section 37-16-3, for providing electric service at retail in
480 Alabama. For purposes of this subdivision, an "electric
481 provider" shall also include an authority as defined in
482 Section 11-50A-1. In the case of an electric provider that is
483 also a tax-exempt organization under the Internal Revenue
484 Code26 U.S.C. § 501, notwithstanding Section 40-18-376(b)(3),
485 any investment credit may be transferred for the entire term
486 of the project agreement, as approved by the Governor. A
487 "renewable energy generation facility" as used in this
488 subdivision shall include any tangible property that is part
489 of renewable energy generation, including any addition,
490 modification, expansion, or upgrade to transmission or
491 distribution systems that is required to accommodate the
492 interconnection of renewable energy generation.
493 d. The conduct of original investigations undertaken on
494 a systematic basis to gain new knowledge or the application of
495 research findings or other scientific knowledge to create new
496 or significantly improved products or processes.
497 e. The national or regional headquarters for a company
498 that conducts significant business operations outside the
499 state and that will serve as the principal office of the
500 company’s principal operating officer with chief
501 responsibility for the daily business operations of the
502 company.
503 f. A target of the state's economic development efforts
504 pursuant to the Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
Page 18

pursuant to the Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
HB393 Enrolled
505 Development Plan adopted in January 2012 by the Alabama
506 Economic Development Alliance, created by Executive Order
507 Number 21 of the Governor on July 18, 2011comprehensive
508 economic development plan, CatALyst, or any amended version or
509 successor document thereto.
510 g. A type listed in a rule adopted by the Department of
511 Commerce, other than an emergency rule.
512 Notwithstanding the foregoing, a qualifying project may
513 not engage predominantly in farming activities involving
514 trees, animals, or crops, and a qualifying project may not
515 engage predominantly in the retail sale of tangible personal
516 property or services, and may not be a shopping center,
517 restaurant, movie theater, bowling alley, fitness center,
518 miniature golf course, nightclub, gaming facility, or
519 establishment serving the local community. However, if the
520 excluded activities are not the predominant activity at the
521 project, and if the project is otherwise a qualifying project,
522 then the project agreement may provide that the capital
523 investment may include costs related to excluded activities
524 that are ancillary to the primary business conducted as part
525 of the project. This provision shall not be deemed to exclude
526 customer service centers, call centers, or headquarters
527 otherwise allowed by this subdivision.
528 (2) A qualifying project shall create a significant
529 number of new jobs for the area in which the qualifying
530 project shall be located. Absent a finding of extraordinary
531 circumstances by the Secretary of Commerce, a qualifying
532 project shall employ either of the following number of new
Page 19

project shall employ either of the following number of new
HB393 Enrolled
533 employees:
534 a. Any number of new employees, for a qualifying
535 project in which the predominant activity involves chemical
536 manufacturing, data centers, renewable energy generation,
537 engineering, design, or research, metal/machining technology
538 or toolmaking; or
539 b. At least 50 new employees, for all other qualifying
540 projects."
541 "§41-23-252
542 For the purpose of this article, the following words
543 and phrases shall have the following meanings:
544 (1) ADECA. The Alabama Department of Economic and
545 Community Affairs.
546 (2) ALABAMA RESEARCH ENTITY. One or more of the
547 following:
548 a. A public or private university in the state in
549 partnership with a private sector applicant.
550 b. A university research foundation affiliated with a
551 public or private university in the state in partnership with
552 a private sector applicant.
553 c. A public two-year college in the state in
554 partnership with a private sector applicant.
555 d. A publicly owned hospital in the state in
556 partnership with a private sector applicant.
557 e. An entity duly formed, domiciled, or qualified to do
558 business in the state in partnership with a private sector
559 applicant and that meets each of the following criteria:
560 1. Is exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. §
Page 20

1. Is exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. §
HB393 Enrolled
561 Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
562 amended.
563 2. Is predominantly engaged in research and
564 non-commercialnoncommercial development activities undertaken
565 for the purpose of discovering information that is
566 technological or biotechnological in nature, involves a
567 process of experimentation, and the application of which is
568 intended to be used in the development of a new or improved
569 product, service, or treatment.
570 3. Has its headquarters and principal place of business
571 in the state.
572 4. Has, or is anticipated to have, at least 75 percent
573 of its property and payroll in Alabama, using the property and
574 payroll factor calculations found in Title 40.
575 (3) APPROVED ACTIVITY. The conduct of an activity that
576 is predominantly any one or more of the following:
577 a. Described by NAICS Code 1133, 115111, 2121, 22111,
578 221330, 31 (other than 311811), 32, 33, 423, 424, 482, 4862,
579 48691, 48699, 48819, 4882, 4883 (other than 48833), 493, 511,
580 5121 (other than 51213), 512215122, 513, 517, 518 (without
581 regard to the premise that data processing and related
582 services be performed in conjunction with a third party),
583 5191351929, 52232, 54133 (if predominantly in furtherance of
584 another activity described in this article), 54134 (if
585 predominantly in furtherance of another activity described in
586 this article), 54138, 5415, 541614, 5417, 55 (if not for the
587 production of electricity), 561422 (other than establishments
588 that originate telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512,
Page 21

that originate telephone calls), 562213, 56291, 56292, 611512,
HB393 Enrolled
589 927, or 92811.
590 b. The production of biofuel as the term is defined in
591 Section 2-2-90(c)(2).
592 c. A target of the state's economic development efforts
593 pursuant to either of the following:
594 1. The Accelerate Alabama Strategic Economic
595 Development Plan adopted in January 2012 by the Alabama
596 Economic Development Alliance, created by Executive Order
597 Number 21 of the Governor on July 18, 2011comprehensive
598 economic development plan, CatALyst, or any amended version or
599 successor document.
600 2. A type listed in a regulation adopted by the
601 Department of Commerce.
602 (4) NAICS CODE. Any sector, subsector, industry group,
603 industry, or national industry of the 20122022 North American
604 Industry Classification System, or any similar classification
605 system developed in conjunction with the United States
606 Department of Commerce or Office of Management and Budget.
607 (5) QUALIFIED RESEARCH. The meaning given in 26 U.S.C.
608 § 41(d), if conducted in Alabama in pursuit of an approved
609 activity. In applying any terms in 26 U.S.C. § 41, "qualified
610 research" shall have the meaning given herein."
611 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
612 2026.
Page 22

2026.
HB393 Enrolled
613
614
615
616
617
618
619
620
621
622 ________________________________________________
623 Speaker of the House of Representatives
624
625
626
627 ________________________________________________
628 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
629
630
631 House of Representatives
632
633 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
634 was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.
635
636 John Treadwell
637 Clerk
638
639
640
641
642
643 Senate 07-Apr-26 Passed
644
645
646
Page 23